src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!LEXICON NMN_VAEQLL
! NMN_1E_VQCC ;
LEXICON NMN_1E_VQCC
! gradation: yes
!! similar_to: N_1Â_VCC
!! vowel: monophthong
!! vowel_shift: yes
!! consonantism: geminate
! weak: single
!! ## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
!! ## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
!!  Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
!!  Lowered: ELSE
!!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! ## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!!  Palatalized: ELSE
!!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! ## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! ## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! ## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
!!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! ## FORMS
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! * Yaml: **N-vaell, N-kall**
!! strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization, low_stem_vowel
:%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    			!!(1) Sg.Nom: väʹll
:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; 	  	    		!!(6) Ess:  väʹllen
!! strong_geminate, short_vowel, depalatalization, low_stem_vowel
: E-STEM_SG-ILL ;	      		!!(3) Sg.Ill: välla
!! strong_geminate, long_vowel, palatalization, low_stem_vowel
:%^V2VV%^PAL E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		!!(2) Pl.Nom:  vääʹll
:%^V2VV A_DER/LAZH ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL PL-NOM ;		!!(2) Pl.Nom:  vääʹll
:%^V2VV%^PAL%>e SG-LOC ;			!!(4) Sg.Loc: vääʹllest
!! strong_geminate, long_vowel, palatalization, high_stem_vowel
:%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL SG-COM_IN ;		!!(5) Sg.Com: vaaʹllin
:%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL E-STEM_PL-OBL ;		!!(5) Sg.Com: vaaʹllin
!! strong_geminate, long_vowel, depalatalization, low_stem_vowel
:%^V2VV E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ;	!!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: väällaž
: E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) väll-
:%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) väʹl-
:%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ; !!= * @CODE@ (12) väʹll Ess+Px..



LEXICON N_EQCHCH !!= * @CODE@ eʹčč:ẹ%^1VOWčč
!!! inflection_type="?"
! vowel: monophthong
!! N_1E_EQSS_EEQZZ
: NMN_EQCHCH ;
LEXICON NMN_EQCHCH
!! vowel_shift: no
!! gradation: yes
!! similarity: N_TOLL:N_KUSS:N_AQVV
!! ## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204, 329)
!! ## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (no vowel shift, all lowered)
!!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! ## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!!  Palatalized: ELSE
!!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! ## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! ## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! ## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
!!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! ## FORMS
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! * Yaml: **N-ecch**
:%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ;		  	!!= * @CODE@ (1) Sg.Nom: eʹčč
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^KK2GG E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) Pl.Nom: eeʼjj
:%^V2VV%^KK2GG A_DER/LAZH ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^KK2GG PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) Pl.Nom: eeʼjj
: E-STEM_SG-ILL ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (3) Sg.Ill: ẹčča
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^KK2GG%>e SG-LOC ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) Sg.Loc: eeʹjjest
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^KK2GG SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) Sg.Com: eeʹjjin
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^KK2GG E-STEM_PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) Sg.Com: eeʹjjin
:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; !!= * @CODE@ (6) Ess: eʹččen
:%^V2VV%^KK2GG E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: eejjaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) ẹčč-
:%^PAL%^KK2GAllegro E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) eʹj-
:%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ; !!= * @CODE@ (12) eʹčč Ess+Px..

LEXICON N_PEQKHKH !!= * @CODE@ peʹǩǩ:pẹ%^1VOWkk
!!! inflection_type="?"
!! N_1E_EQKK
! vowel: monophthong
! 
: NMN_PEQKHKH ;
LEXICON NMN_PEQKHKH
!! vowel_shift: no
!! gradation: yes
!! similarity: N_1Â_VCC

!! ## FORMS
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! * Yaml: **N-peqkhkh**
:%^PAL%^PALK E-STEM_SG-NOM ;		  	!!= * @CODE@ (1) Sg.Nom: peʹǩǩ
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^PALK E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) Pl.Nom: peeʼǩǩ
:%^V2VV A_DER/LAZH ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^PALK PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) Pl.Nom: peeʼǩǩ
: E-STEM_SG-ILL ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (3) Sg.Ill: pẹkka
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^PALK%>e SG-LOC ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) Sg.Loc: peeʹǩǩest
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^PALK SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) Sg.Com: peeʹǩǩin
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^PALK E-STEM_PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) Sg.Com: peeʹǩǩin
:%^PAL%^PALK%>e ESS/PAR ; !!= * @CODE@ (6) Ess: eʹččen
:%^V2VV E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: peekkaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) ẹkk-
:%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro%^PALK E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) eʹǩ-
:%^PAL%^PALK  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ; !!= * @CODE@ (12) eʹǩǩ Ess+Px..


LEXICON N_AQVV !!= * @CODE@ äʹvv:ä%^1VOW{ʹØ}vv
!!! inflection_type="?"
!! N_1E_SVQCC
!! SV = stable vowel
: NMN_AQVV ;
LEXICON NMN_AQVV
!! vowel: monophthong
!! vowel_shift: no
!! gradation: yes
!! similarity: N_TOLL:N_KUSS:N_EQCHCH
!! ## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204, 329)
!! ## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (no vowel shift, all lowered)
!!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! ## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!!  Palatalized: ELSE
!!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! ## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! ## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! ## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
!!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! ## FORMS
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! * Yaml: **N-aevv**
!!
:%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ; !!(1) Sg.Nom: äʹvv
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: ääʼv
:%^V2VV%^CC2C A_DER/LAZH ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C PL-NOM ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: ääʼv
: E-STEM_SG-ILL ;   !!(3) Sg.Ill: ävva
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C%>e SG-LOC ;	!!(4) Sg.Loc: ääʹvest
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C SG-COM_IN ; !!(5) Sg.Com: ääʹvin
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM_PL-OBL ; !!(5) Sg.Com: ääʹvin
:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; !!(6) Ess: äʹvven
:%^V2VV%^CC2C E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ; !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: äävaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) ävv-
:%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) äʹv-
:%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ; !!= * @CODE@ (12) äʹvv Ess+Px..



LEXICON N_STAEQLLJ !!= * @CODE@ stäʹllj:stä%^1VOW{ʹØ}llj
!!! inflection_type="?"
!! N_1E_VQCC_VVQC
!V1ʹC1C1
: NMN_STAEQLLJ ;
LEXICON NMN_STAEQLLJ
!! vowel: monophthong
!! vowel_shift: yes
!! gradation: yes
!! similarity: N_TOLL:N_KUSS:N_EQCHCH:N_AQVV
!! ## FORMS
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! * Yaml: **N-staellj**
!!
:%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ; !!(1) Sg.Nom: äʹvv
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!(2) Sg.Gen: stääʼlj
:%^V2VV%^CC2C A_DER/LAZH ;
: E-STEM_SG-ILL ;   !!(3) Sg.Ill: ställja
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C%>e SG-LOC ;	!!(4) Sg.Loc: stääʹljest
:%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2C SG-COM_IN ; !!(5) Sg.Com: staaʹljin
:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; !!(6) Ess: äʹvven
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C PL-NOM ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: stääʼlj
:%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM_PL-OBL ; !!(5) Pl.Gen: staaʹlji
:%^V2VV%^CC2C E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ; !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: äävaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) ställj-
:%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) stäʹlj-
:%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ; !!= * @CODE@ (12) stäʹllj Ess+Px..

LEXICON N_1E_EQCC !!= * @CODE@ peʹllj:pẹ%^1VOW{ʹØ}llj
 NMN_1E_EQCC ;
LEXICON N_PEQLLJ !!= * @CODE@ peʹllj:pẹ%^1VOW{ʹØ}llj
!!! inflection_type="?"
!! N_1E_SVQCC
!: NMN_PEQLLJ ;
 NMN_1E_EQCC ;
LEXICON NMN_PEQLLJ
 NMN_1E_EQCC ;
LEXICON NMN_1E_EQCC
!! vowel: monophthong
!! vowel_shift: no
!! gradation: yes
!! ## FORMS
!!
:%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ; !!(1) Sg.Nom: peʹllj
:%^V2VV%^PAL E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!(2) Sg.Gen: peeʼllj
:%^V2VV A_DER/LAZH ;
: E-STEM_SG-ILL ;   !!(3) Sg.Ill: pẹllja
:%^V2VV%^PAL%>e SG-LOC ;	!!(4) Sg.Loc: peeʹlljest
:%^V2VV%^PAL SG-COM_IN ; !!(5) Sg.Com: peeʹlljin
:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; !!(6) Ess: peʹlljen
:%^V2VV%^PAL PL-NOM ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: peeʼllj
:%^V2VV%^PAL E-STEM_PL-OBL ; !!(5) Pl.Gen: peeʹllji
:%^V2VV E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ; !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: peelljaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) pellj-
:%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) peʹlj-
:%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ; !!= * @CODE@ (12) peʹllj Ess+Px..

LEXICON N_AQKHKH !!= * @CODE@ äʹǩǩ:äkk
!!! inflection_type="?"
!! N_1E_VQKK
! vowel: monophthong
! V1ʹC1C1
!: NMN_AQKHKH ;
 NMN_1E_VQKK ;

LEXICON N_1E_VVQKK !!= * @CODE@ lääʹǩǩ:lää{ʹØ}kk
 NMN_1E_VVQKK ;
LEXICON NMN_1E_VVQKK
!! * Yaml: **N-saeaemm**
!!
:%^PAL%^PALK E-STEM_SG-NOM ;		  !!(1) Sg.Nom: sääʹmm
:%^PAL%^KK2GG%^PALK E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: sääʹm
:%^KK2GG A_DER/LAZH ;
:%^PAL%^KK2GG%^PALK PL-NOM ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: sääʹm
:%^VV2V E-STEM_SG-ILL ; !!(3) Sg.Ill: sämma
:%^PAL%^KK2GG%^PALK%>e SG-LOC ; !!(4) Sg.Loc: sääʹmest
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^KK2GG%^PALK SG-COM_IN ; !!(5) Sg.Com: saaʹmin
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^KK2GG%^PALK E-STEM_PL-OBL ; !!(5) Sg.Com: saaʹmin
:%^PAL%^PALK%>e ESS/PAR ; !!(6) Ess: sääʹmmen
:%^KK2GG E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ; !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: säämaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) säämm-
:%^VV2V%^PAL%^KK2GAllegro%^PALK E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) säʹm-
:%^VV2V%^PAL%^PALK  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ; !!= * @CODE@ (12) säʹmm Ess+Px..

LEXICON N_1E_VVQCC !!= * @CODE@ sääʹmm:sää{ʹØ}mm
!!! inflection_type="?"
!: NMN_SAAQMM ;
 NMN_1E_VVQCC ;
LEXICON NMN_1E_VVQCC
! gradation: yes
! vowel: monophthong
! weak: single
!! ## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
!! ## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
!!  Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
!!  Lowered: ELSE
!!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! ## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!!  Palatalized: ELSE
!!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! ## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! ## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! ## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
!!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! ## FORMS
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! * Yaml: **N-saeaemm**
!!
:%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ;		  !!(1) Sg.Nom: sääʹmm
:%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: sääʹm
:%^CC2C A_DER/LAZH ;
:%^PAL%^CC2C PL-NOM ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: sääʹm
:%^VV2V E-STEM_SG-ILL ; !!(3) Sg.Ill: sämma
:%^PAL%^CC2C%>e SG-LOC ; !!(4) Sg.Loc: sääʹmest
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2C SG-COM_IN ; !!(5) Sg.Com: saaʹmin
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM_PL-OBL ; !!(5) Sg.Com: saaʹmin
:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; !!(6) Ess: sääʹmmen
:%^CC2C E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ; !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: säämaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) säämm-
:%^VV2V%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) säʹm-
:%^VV2V%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ; !!= * @CODE@ (12) säʹmm Ess+Px..

LEXICON N_1E_VVQCC_PL
+Cmp/SgNom:%^PAL R ; !!(1) Sg.Nom: sääʹmm
:%^PAL%^CC2C PL-NOM ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: sääʹm
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2C PL-OBL ; !!(5) Sg.Com: saaʹmin
:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; !!(6) Ess: sääʹmmen


LEXICON N_CHAAQCC !!= * @CODE@ čääʹcc:čääcc
!!! inflection_type="?"
!! N_1E_VVQSS
!! SS = SS-ZZ
: NMN_CHAAQCC ;
